Wyoming, session 2025, SF0090.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xliv) is amended to read:

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
(xliv) Effective beginning with school year
2025-2026, adopt a policy to allow the participation of
SF0090

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0479
patriotic organizations at public schools within the
district, in accordance with the following:

(A) Allow a representative of a patriotic
organization the opportunity, during school hours and
instructional time, to speak with and distribute
informational materials in a classroom setting to students,
to encourage participation in the patriotic organization
and its activities and to inform students of how the
patriotic organization may further the students'
educational interests and civic involvement and better the
students' school, community and themselves. A policy
allowing a representative of a patriotic organization to
speak with students under this subsection shall:

(I) Provide a specific date and time
for the patriotic organization to speak to students at
schools within the district after the patriotic
organization has provided reasonable notice of its intent
to speak to students and provide displays;

(II) Notify parents or guardians of
each patriotic organization's expected presentation and the
SF0090

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0479
option of the parents or guardians to withhold consent for
their child to participate in the presentation.

(B) Provide opportunities for a patriotic
organization to provide displays at schools within the
district for student recruitment. The displays may include
informational materials and the use of other existing
communication channels. The school district shall not
unreasonably limit a patriotic organization in the use of
any school building or property for the purposes of a
display authorized under this subparagraph if the
activities occur outside of the school day;

(C) Nothing in this paragraph shall require
a school district that allows a patriotic organization to
speak with or distribute informational materials to
students under this paragraph to provide equal access to an
organization that is not designated as a patriotic
organization;

(D) As used in this paragraph, "patriotic
organization" means a youth membership organization serving
persons under the age of twenty-one (21) that has an
SF0090

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0479
educational purpose, that promotes patriotism and civic
involvement and that is a 4-H club or is an organization
listed in 36 U.S.C. §§ 30101, 30901, 31101, 40301, 70901,
80301, 140101 or 154101.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0090